Maryland, session 2025, SB0554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0554*

SENATE BILL 554
Article – General Provisions
4–1A–01.
There is a State Public Information Act Compliance Board.
4–1A–04.
(b) The Board shall:
(1) receive, review, and, subject to § 4–1A–07 of this subtitle, resolve
complaints filed under § 4–1A–05 of this subtitle from any custodian alleging that an
applicant’s request or pattern of requests is frivolous, vexatious, ABUSIVE, or in bad faith;
(2) issue a written decision as to whether the applicant’s request or pattern
of requests is frivolous, vexatious, ABUSIVE, or in bad faith; and
(3) if the Board finds that the applicant’s request is frivolous, vexatious,
ABUSIVE, or in bad faith, based on the totality of the circumstances including the number
and scope of the applicant’s past requests and the custodian’s responses to past requests
and efforts to cooperate with the applicant, issue an order authorizing the custodian to:
(i) ignore the request OR PATTERN OF REQUESTS that is the
subject of the custodian’s complaint, INCLUDING, IN THE BOARD’S DISCRETION,
FUTURE REQUESTS ON THE SAME OR SIMILAR TOPICS; [or]
(ii) respond to a less burdensome version of the request within a
reasonable time frame, as determined by the Board; OR
(III) PROVIDE ANY OTHER NONMONETARY RELIEF THAT, IN THE
BOARD’S DISCRETION, IS APPROPRIATE UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES, INCLUDING
AN ORDER THAT THE CUSTODIAN NEED NOT RESPOND TO FUTURE REQUESTS FROM
THE APPLICANT OR ANOTHER PERSON MAKING A REQUEST ON BEHALF OF THE
APPLICANT FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME.
4–1A–05.
(a) Any applicant, the applicant’s designated representative, or a custodian may
file a written complaint with the Board seeking a written decision and order from the Board
under § 4–1A–04 of this subtitle if:
(1) the complainant has attempted to resolve the dispute through the
Office of the Public Access Ombudsman under § 4–1B–04 of this title; and

SENATE BILL 554 3
(2) the Public Access Ombudsman has issued a final determination stating
that the dispute was not resolved.
(C) THE BOARD MAY DISMISS A COMPLAINT BEFORE REQUESTING OR
RECEIVING A RESPONSE TO THE COMPLAINT IF IT DETERMINES THAT THE
COMPLAINT IS FRIVOLOUS, VEXATIOUS, ABUSIVE, OR IN BAD FAITH.
4–1A–10.
(a) [A person or governmental unit] AN APPLICANT OR CUSTODIAN need not
exhaust the administrative remedy under this subtitle before filing suit.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, an applicant, a
complainant, or a custodian may appeal the decision issued by the Board under this subtitle
in accordance with § 4–362 of this title.
(2) An appeal under this subsection automatically stays the decision of the
Board pending the circuit court’s decision.
(3) A COMPLAINANT MAY APPEAL THE BOARD’S DISMISSAL OF A
COMPLAINT UNDER § 4–1A–05(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
4–362.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph [(3)] (4) of this subsection, whenever a person or
governmental unit is denied inspection of a public record or is not provided with a copy,
printout, or photograph of a public record as requested, the person or governmental unit
may file a complaint with the circuit court.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A CUSTODIAN
MAY FILE A COMPLAINT IN CIRCUIT COURT ALLEGING THAT AN APPLICANT’S
REQUEST OR PATTERN OF REQUESTS IS FRIVOLOUS, VEXATIOUS, ABUSIVE, OR IN
BAD FAITH.
[(2)] (3) Except as otherwise provided in Subtitle 1A of this title and
subject to paragraph [(3)] (4) of this subsection, an applicant, a complainant, or a custodian
may appeal to the circuit court a decision issued by the State Public Information Act
Compliance Board as provided under § 4–1A–10 of this title.
[(3)] (4) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A complaint or an appeal under this subsection shall be filed with the circuit
court for the county where:
[(i) for appeals of decisions by the Board issued in accordance with
the Board’s authority under § 4–1A–04(b) of this title, the applicant resides or has a
principal place of business;]

SENATE BILL 554
[(ii)] (I) the complainant resides or has a principal place of
business; or
[(iii)] (II) the public record is located.
(5) A COMPLAINT FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND APPEALS OF DECISIONS BY THE BOARD ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE BOARD’S AUTHORITY UNDER § 4–1A–04(B) OF THIS TITLE MAY BE FILED
WITH THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY WHERE:
(I) THE PUBLIC RECORD IS LOCATED; OR
(II) THE APPLICANT RESIDES OR HAS A PRINCIPAL PLACE OF
BUSINESS.
(b) (1) Unless, for good cause shown, the court otherwise directs, and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the defendant shall serve an answer or
otherwise plead to the complaint within 30 days after service of the complaint.
(2) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE defendant:
(i) has the burden of sustaining a decision to:
1. deny inspection of a public record; or
2. deny the person or governmental unit a copy, printout, or
photograph of a public record; and
(ii) in support of the decision, may submit a memorandum to the
court.
(3) FOR A COMPLAINT FILED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE CUSTODIAN HAS THE BURDEN OF DEMONSTRATING
THAT THE REQUEST OR PATTERN OF REQUESTS IS FRIVOLOUS, VEXATIOUS,
ABUSIVE, OR IN BAD FAITH.
(c) (1) Except for cases that the court considers of greater importance, a
proceeding under this section, including an appeal, shall:
(i) take precedence on the docket;
(ii) be heard at the earliest practicable date; and
(iii) be expedited in every way.

SENATE BILL 554 5
(2) The court may examine the public record in camera to determine
whether any part of the public record may be withheld under this title.
(3) The court may:
(i) enjoin the State, a political subdivision, or a unit, an official, or
an employee of the State or of a political subdivision from:
1. withholding the public record; or
2. withholding a copy, printout, or photograph of the public
record;
(ii) issue an order for the production of the public record or a copy,
printout, or photograph of the public record that was withheld from the complainant; and
(iii) for noncompliance with the order, punish the responsible
employee for contempt.
(4) FOR A COMPLAINT FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COURT MAY ISSUE AN ORDER AUTHORIZING THE CUSTODIAN TO:
(I) IGNORE THE REQUEST OR PATTERN OF REQUESTS THAT IS
THE SUBJECT OF THE CUSTODIAN’S COMPLAINT, INCLUDING FUTURE REQUESTS ON
THE SAME OR SIMILAR TOPICS;
(II) RESPOND TO A LESS BURDENSOME VERSION OF THE
REQUEST WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME FRAME; OR
(III) PROVIDE ANY OTHER RELIEF THAT, IN THE COURT’S
DISCRETION, IS APPROPRIATE UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES, INCLUDING AN ORDER
THAT THE CUSTODIAN NEED NOT RESPOND TO FUTURE REQUESTS FROM THE
APPLICANT OR ANOTHER PERSON MAKING A REQUEST ON BEHALF OF THE
APPLICANT FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME.
(g) Notwithstanding § 12–302(a) of the Courts Article, a party who is aggrieved
by a final judgment of a circuit court in a judicial review proceeding under subsection
[(a)(2)] (A)(3) of this section may appeal to the Appellate Court of Maryland in the manner
that law provides for appeal of civil cases.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.